Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5735.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Community overdose review" means performing a series of individual overdose reviews to identify systematic barriers to innovative overdose prevention and intervention strategies for that community. (b) "County health officer" means a local health officer as that term is defined in section 1105 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1105. (c) "Data sharing agreement" means an agreement that identifies the data that are shared and how the data are used. (d) "Drug" means that term as defined in section 7105 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7105. (e) "Drug overdose" means that term as defined in section 7403 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403. (f) "Hospital" means that term as defined in section 20106 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106, except that it also includes a hospital licensed under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (g) "Identifying information" means any representation of information that permits the identity of an individual to whom the information applies to be reasonably inferred by either direct or indirect means. (h) "Individual overdose review" means the case review of an individual who has died as the result of a drug overdose, including, but not limited to, a review of both of the following: (i) Consideration of the individual's points of contact, if any, with health care systems, social services, educational institutions, child and family services, the criminal justice system, including law enforcement, and any other system. (ii) Identification of the specific factors and social determinants of health that put the individual at risk of a drug overdose. (i) "Mental health provider" means any of the following individuals: (i) A psychologist as that term is defined in section 18201 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18201. (ii) A licensed professional counselor as that term is defined in section 18101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18101. (iii) A marriage and family therapist as that term is defined in section 16901 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16901. (iv) A licensed bachelor's social worker as that term is defined in section 18501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18501. (v) A licensed master's social worker as that term is defined in section 18501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18501. (j) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group of professionals from a variety of fields of study or sectors who work together toward a shared purpose. (k) "Overdose fatality review team" means the multidisciplinary team established under this act by a county, a group of counties, or a tribe to conduct individual overdose reviews and overdose fatality reviews. (l) "Participating county" means a county that, by itself or with 1 or more other counties, establishes an overdose fatality review team under section 5(1). (m) "Recovery coach" means a professional who provides assistance to support long-term recovery from a substance use disorder. (n) "Substance use disorder" means a pattern of using alcohol or other drugs that leads to clinical or functional impairment. (o) "Substance use disorder treatment provider" means an individual or entity that is licensed or exempt from licensure in this state to treat an individual with substance use disorder using medications that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to treat substance use disorder. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5729 (request no. H03349'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.